Utah statutes.
63G-6-415.   Rules and regulations to determine allowable incurred costs --
Required information -- Auditing of books.
(1)  Rules and regulations may be promulgated to set forth cost principles to
be used to determine the allowability of incurred costs for the purpose of
reimbursing costs under contract provisions which provide for the
reimbursement of costs; provided that if a written determination is approved
at a level above the procurement officer, the cost principles may be modified
by contract.
(2)  A person shall, except as provided in Subsection (4), submit cost or
pricing data and shall certify that, to the best of the person's knowledge and
belief, the cost or pricing data submitted were accurate, complete, and
current as of a mutually determined specified date prior to the date of:
(a)  the pricing of any contract awarded by competitive sealed proposals or
pursuant to the sole source procurement authority, where the total contract
price is expected to exceed an amount established by rules and regulations; or
(b)  the pricing of any change order which is expected to exceed an amount
established by rules and regulations.
(3)  Any contract or change order under which a certificate is required shall
contain a provision that the price to the state, including profit or fee,
shall be adjusted to exclude any significant sums by which the state finds
that the price was increased because the contractor-furnished cost or pricing
data were inaccurate, incomplete, or not current as of the date agreed upon
between the parties.
(4)  The requirements of Subsections (2) and (3) need not be applied to
contracts:
(a)  where the contract price is based on adequate price competition;
(b)  where the contract price is based on established catalogue prices or
market prices;
(c)  where contract prices are set by law or regulation; or
(d)  where it is determined in writing in accordance with rules and
regulations that the requirements of this section may be waived, and the
reasons for such waiver are stated in writing.
(5)  The state may, at reasonable times and places, audit the books and
records of any person who has submitted cost or pricing data pursuant to this
section or any contractor or subcontractor under any negotiated contract or
subcontract other than a firm fixed-price contract to the extent that the
books and records relate to the cost or pricing data, contract, or
subcontract. The books and records shall be maintained by the contractor for
three years following the end of the fiscal year in which final payment is
made under the prime contract and by the subcontractor for three years
following the end of the fiscal year in which final payment is made under the
subcontract, unless a shorter period is otherwise authorized in writing.
